District of Columbia statutes.
7-1306.03a

Rules for implementation.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 603a
as added Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 506(aa), 42 DCR 3684

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1983.1.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4(k) of Human Services Spending Reduction Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-29, July 25, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 4002).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 4(k) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-35, April 11, 1995, 42 DCR 1834), § 4(k) of the Human Services Spending Reduction Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-104, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4014), and § 506(aa) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to title V of D.C. Law 11-52, the “Omnibus Budget Support Act of 1995”, see Mayor’s Order 97-53, March 19, 1997 ( 44 DCR 2162).
Delegation of Authority under D.C. Law 2-137, Mentally Retarded Citizens Constitutional Rights and Dignity Act of 1978, see Mayor’s Order 2004-49, March 30, 2004 ( 51 DCR 4133).